Maryland, session 2026, SB0683.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
7–218.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Agrivoltaics” has the meaning stated in § 7–306.2 of this title.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0683*

SENATE BILL 683
(3) “Brownfields site” has the meaning stated in § 7–207 of this subtitle.
(4) “Local jurisdiction” includes counties, municipal corporations, and
other forms of local government.
(5) “Priority preservation area” means an area certified as a priority
preservation area under § 2–518 of the Agriculture Article.
(6) (i) “Project area” means an area within which construction,
materials and equipment storage, grading, landscaping, and related activities for a project
may occur.
(ii) “Project area” includes one or more contiguous parcels or
properties under the same ownership or lease agreement.
(h) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (3) and (4) of this subsection, a local
jurisdiction may not:
(i) adopt zoning laws or other laws or regulations that prohibit the
construction or operation of solar energy generating stations; or
(ii) deny site development plans for solar energy generating stations
that meet the requirements of subsection (f) of this section.
(2) A local jurisdiction shall:
(i) expedite the review and approval of site development plans for
solar energy generating stations if those plans meet the requirements of this section; and
(ii) for solar energy generating stations with a generating capacity
of not more than 5 megawatts, as measured by the alternating current rating of the solar
energy generating station’s inverter, process the site development plan application as a
permitted use subject to the review standards in § 4–205 of the Land Use Article.
(3) A ground mounted solar energy generating station with a generating
capacity of more than 5 megawatts, as measured by the alternating current rating of the
solar energy generating station’s inverter, may not be located on any lot, parcel, or tract of
land that, as of January 1, 2025, is located within:
(i) a Tier 1 or Tier 2 mapped locally designated growth area adopted
under § 1–506 of the Land Use Article;
(ii) a medium density residential area or high density residential
area, as defined in § 5–1601 of the Natural Resources Article; or
(iii) a mixed–use area with a residential component.

SENATE BILL 683 3
(4) (i) The total combined number of solar energy generating stations
that may be approved for construction in a priority preservation area that was established
before January 1, 2025, shall:
1. be limited in area to 5% of the total acreage of the priority
preservation area;
2. be located in the project area within the priority
preservation area; and
3. meet all requirements under this section.
(ii) The prohibitions in paragraph (1) of this subsection do not apply
to the remaining 95% of a priority preservation area once the 5% limitation under
subparagraph (i) of this paragraph has been achieved for the priority preservation area.
(iii) A COUNTY MAY CREDIT SOLAR ENERGY GENERATING
STATIONS THAT ARE APPROVED AFTER JANUARY 1, 2027, AND ARE LOCATED ON
BROWNFIELDS, SCHOOL ROOFTOPS OR FIELDS, OR OTHER UNDERUTILIZED LAND,
TOWARD THE 5% LIMITATION IN SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
(IV) A county shall report to the Commission when the 5% limitation
under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph has been achieved for a priority preservation
area.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.